California, session 20252026, AB1067.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7522.76 is added to the Government Code, to read:7522.76. (a) If a public employee, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 7522.04, retires while under investigation by a public employer for misconduct arising out of or in the performance of the public employee’s official duties, in pursuit of the office or appointment, or in connection with obtaining salary, disability retirement, service retirement, or other benefits, the public employer shall continue the investigation even after the employee retires if the public employer’s investigation indicates that the public employee may have committed a crime.(b) If the public employer’s investigation indicates that a public employee may have committed a crime, the public employer shall refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency and the public employer may then close the investigation. If the public employee is convicted of a felony for any conduct described in subdivision (a), the public employee shall forfeit all accrued rights and benefits in any public retirement system in which the employee is a member in accordance with Section 7522.70, 7522.72, or 7522.74, as applicable, effective on the date of the conviction.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.